patterns/hyph_la_liturgical.dic
.pro5s4ta1n
.prosta1
.p1ro5s4ta1r
.pro4s3ti1t
.prosti1
.pro4s3tra1
.p1rost4r
.pro4s3trá1
.pro3u1
.pse4udo1
.2p1s
.pse1
.pseu1
.pseu1d
.qua2m3o2b3
.1qu4
.qua1
.qua1m
.quamo1
.que2m3a2d3m
.que1
.que1m
.quema1
.quema1d
.que2m3á2d3m
.quemá1
.quemá1d
.qui1n2c3u1n
.qui1
.qui1n
.qui2n1c
.qu1incu3
.quoa2d3u2sq
.quo1
.quoa1
.quoa1d
.quoadu1
.quoadu1s
.quoa2d3ú2sq
.quoadú1
.quoadú1s
.quo6d5l
.quo1d
.quo6n3ia1m
.quo1n
.quoni1
.quonia1
.quó6n3ia1m
.quó1
.quó1n
.quóni1
.quónia1
.quo2t1a1n
.quo1t
.quota1
.quo2t1e1n
.quote1
.quo2t1i4e1
.quoti1
.quó2t1i4e1
.quó1t
.quóti1
.quo2t3li1
.quot2l
.1r2
.ra2y1
.ra1
.re2d1a1c
.re1
.re1d
.reda1
.re2d1á1c
.redá1
.re2d1a1d
.re2d1á1d
.re2d1a1m
.re2d1á1m
.re2d1a2m1b
.re2d1á2m1b
.re2d1a1n
.re2d1á1n
.1re2d1a1r
.1re2d1á1r
.re2d1a2r1g
.re2d1á2r1g
.re2d1a2u1
.re2d1á2u1
.re2d1ea1
.re1de1
.ré2d1ea1
.ré1
.ré1d
.réde1
.re2d1eá1
.re2d1e1g
.re2d1é1g
.redé1
.re2d1e1m
.re2d1é1m
.re2d1eo1
.ré2d1eo1
.re2d1eu1
.re2d1e5ú1
.ré2d1eu1
.re2d3h
.re2d1i.
.redi1
.re2d1i1b
.re2d1í1b
.redí1
.re3d2i1c
.re2d1ie1n
.re1die1
.ré2d1ie1n
.rédi1
.rédie1
.1re2d1ie1r
.1re2d1íe1r
.re1dí5e1
.1re2d1ié1r
.redié1
.re2d1i1i1
.ré2d1i1i1
.re2d1í5i1
.re2d1ií1
.re2d1i1g
.ré2d1i1g
.re2d1i1m
.re2d1í1m
.ré2d1i1m
.re4d3i1mi1
.re2d1i1n
.re2d1í1n
.1re2d1i1r
.1re2d1í1r
.re2d5i1s
.re2d5i1t
.re2d5í1t
.ré2d5i1t
.re2d1i1v
.re2d1í1v
.re2d1o1l
.redo1
.re2d1ó1l
.redó1
.ré2d1o1l
.rédo1
.re2d1o1p
.re2d1ó1p
.re2d1o2r1d
.1redo1r
.re2d1ó2r1d
.1redó1r
.re3d2o2r1m
.re2d1o2r1n
.re2d1ó2r1n
.re2d1u1l
.redu1
.re2d1ú1l
.redú1
.re2d1u1n
.re2d1ú1n
.re2d1u1v
.re2d1ú1v
.ree2x
.ree1
.re1i2e1
.rei1
.re3i2e1c
.re1i1n
.re3i2p1s
.rei1p
.re3ite1
.rei1t
.repa2u1
.re1p
.repa1
.1re3s2c6r
.re1s
.re2s1c
.re3s2cu3
.re3s2cú1
.re3s2p
.re4s3pu4b3l4i1c
.respu1
.respu1b
.respub2l
.respubli1
.re4s3pú4b3l4i1c
.respú1
.respú1b
.respúb2l
.respúbli1
.ré3s2p
.ré1s
.re3s2pe1c
.respe1
.re3s2pé1c
.respé1
.re5s4ta1
.re4s1t
.re5s4tá1
.re5s2ta1g
.re5s4ta2u1
.1re5s2te1r
.reste1
.1re5s2té1r
.resté1
.re5s2ti1b
.resti1
.re5s2tí1b
.restí1
.re5s2ti1c
.re6s3ticu3
.re5s2ti1l
.re5s2ti1n
.re5s2tí1n
.re5s2ti1p
.re5s2tí1p
.ré5s4ti1t
.ré4s1t
.résti1
.re5s4ti1t
.re5s4tí1t
.re5s2to1
.1re5s4t4r
.1ré5s4t4r
.1s2
.sa2t1a1g
.sa1
.sa1t
.sata1
.sa2t1á1g
.satá1
.1sati2s1
.sati1
.sa3u4l.
.sa2u1
.sau1l
.seme2t3i1p
.se1
.se1m
.seme1
.seme1t
.semeti1
.se2m3u1n
.semu1
.1se2m3u1s
.se3s4ce1n
.1se1s
.se2s1c
.se3s2ce1
.ses2c1u4n
.sescu3
.se4u.
.seu1
.si2c1u4t3
.si1
.si1c
.sicu3
.sí2c1u4t3
.sí1
.sí1c
.sícu3
.si3s2te1n
.si1s
.si4s1t
.siste1
.2s2m
.sta3g2n
.4s1t
.sta1
.sta1g
.su2b3
.su1
.sú2b3
.sú1
.subi4a1
.subi1
.subi4á1
.subi4e1
.subi4é1
.subi4i1
.subi4í1
.súbi4i1
.súbi1
.su1bi4u1
.subi4ú1
.sub5s4c6r
.1su2b1s
.sub2s1c
.sub5s4t
.súb5s4t
.1sú2b1s
.subte2r3h
.su2b1t
.subte1
.subte1r
.su3b4u1l
.su1bu1
.sú3b4u1l
.súbu1
.su4b5u2l1c
.su4b5u4l1t
.supe2r1a1b
.su1p
.supe1
.supe1r
.supera1
.supé2r1a1b
.supé1
.supé1r
.supéra1
.supe2r1á1b
.superá1
.supe3r2a1ba1
.supe3r2abá1
.supe3r2ába1
.supe3r2abe1
.supe3r2ábe1
.supe3r2abi1
.supe3r2ábi1
.supe3r2abí1
.supera2b3l
.superá2b3l
.supe3r2abo1
.supe3r2ábo1
.su1pe3r2abu1
.su1pe3r2ábu1
.su1pé3r2abu1
.supe3r2abú1
.supe4r3a2b3u1m
.supe4r3a2b3u4n1d
.superabu1n
.supe4r3a2b3ú4n1d
.superabú1n
.supe2r1a1c
.supe2r1a1d
.supé2r1a1d
.supe2r1á1d
.supera2d1i2i1
.superadi1
.supera2d1i2í1
.supe2r1ad4s2t
.1supera2d1s
.supé2r1ad4s2t
.1supéra2d1s
.supe2r1æ1
.supe3r2æ.
.supé2r1æ1
.supé3r2æ.
.supe2r1a1g
.supe2r1á1g
.supé2r1a1g
.supe2r1a2l1l
.supera1l
.supe2r1á2l1l
.superá1l
.supe3r2a1m
.supé3r2a1m
.supe4r3a2m1b
.supe4r3á2m1b
.superá1m
.supe3r2a4n1d
.supera1n
.supe3r2á4n1d
.superá1n
.su1pe4r3a1p
.supe2r1a2r1g
.supera1r
.supé2r1a2r1g
.supéra1r
.supe2r1a2s1c
.1supera1s
.su1pe2r1a3s2p
.su1pé2r1a3s2p
.1supéra1s
.supe2r1a4s2t
.supé2r1a4s2t
.supe2r1a2t1t
.supera1t
.supé2r1a2t1t
.supéra1t
.supe2r1bi1b
.supe2r1b
.superbi1
.supé2r1bi1b
.supé2r1b
.supérbi1
.supe2r1bi1f
.supé2r1bi1f
.supe2r1bi1l
.supé2r1bi1l
.supe2r1c
.supé2r1c
.supe2r1d
.supé2r1d
.supe2r1e1d
.supe1re1
.supé2r1e1d
.supére1
.supe2r1e2f1f
.supere1f
.supé2r1e2f1f
.supére1f
.supe2r1é2f1f
.superé1
.superé1f
.supe2r1e1g
.supé2r1e1g
.supe2r1e1l
.supe2r1é1l
.supe2r1e1m
.supe2r1é1m
.supé2r1e1m
.supe3r2e4m.
.supe3r2emini.
.superemi1
.superemi1n
.superemini1
.supe3r2émini.
.superémi1
.superémi1n
.superémini1
.su1pe3r2emu1
.su1pe3r2ému1
.supe2r1e1n
.supé2r1e1n
.supe2r1é1n
.supe3r2e2n1t
.supe3r2é2n1t
.supe2r1e1r
.supé2r1e1r
.supe3r2e4r.
.supe3r2ere.
.superere1
.supe3r2er2i4s.
.supereri1
.supereri1s
.supé3r2er2i4s.
.supéreri1
.supéreri1s
.1supe2r1e1s
.1supe2r1é1s
.1súpe2r1e1s
.sú1p
.súpe1
.súpe1r
.súpe1re1
.super3e4s.
.súper3e4s.
.su1pe2r1eu1
.supe2r1e1v
.supe2r1é1v
.supe2r1e2x3
.supé2r1e2x3
.supe2r3h
.supe2r3i2
.supe3r4i.
.supé2r3i2
.supé3r4i.
.supe2r1i1l
.supe2r1í1l
.superí1
.supe2r1i1m
.supe3r4i3mini.
.superimi1
.superimi1n
.superimini1
.supe2r1i1n
.superi1n3i4i1
.superi1ni1
.superin3i4í1
.supe3r4i3o1
.supé3r4i3o1
.supe3r4i3ó1
.supe2r1i1r
.supe3r4i4s.
.superi1s
.supé3r4i4s.
.supéri1s
.su1pe3r4i3u1
.su1pé3r4i3u1
.supe4r5i4ume1
.superiu1m
.supe2r1o2b1d
.supero1
.supero1b
.supe2r1o2b3r
.supe2r1ó2b3r
.superó1
.superó1b
.su1pe2r1o2b1u1
.supe2r1o2b1ú1
.supe2r1o1c
.supe2r1ó1c
.su1pe2r1o1p
.supe3r2o1r
.supe4r3o2r1d
.supe2r3s2c
.1supe2r1s
.su1pe2r3s2p
.supe2r5s4t
.supé2r5s4t
.1supé2r1s
.supe2r1sub4s2t
.supersu1
.supersu1b
.1super1su2b1s
.su1pe2r3u1
.supe2r3ú1
.supe3r4u4m.
.superu1m
.supe3r4u4s.
.superu1s
.supra3s2c
.sup2r
.supra1
.supra1s
.su5s4c6r
.1su1s
.su2s1c
.su3s2pe1c
.su2s1p
.suspe1
.su3s2pé1c
.suspé1
.su4s3pe1n
.su4s3pé1n
.su3s2pi1c
.suspi1
.su3s2pí1c
.suspí1
.sú3s2pi1c
.sú1s
.sú2s1p
.súspi1
.su3s2pi1r
.su3s2pí1r
.1t2
.ta2m3
.ta1
.te2r1i2u1
.te1
.te1r
.teri1
.ter2p2s
.te2r1p
.te2r1u1n
.teru1
.te2r1ú1n
.terú1
.1te1tra3e2t
.1te1t
.tet4r
.tetra1
.tetrae1
.tetra3g2n
.tetra1g
.1te1tra4s2t
.tetra1s
.1te2u1t
.teu1
.the2o1
.t2h4
.the1
.theo3g2n
.theo1g
.the3s2p
.the1s
.1the4s2t
.thi3s2b
.thi1
.thi1s
.tra1i2a1
.t4r
.tra1
.trai1
.tra1i2e1
.tra1i4i1
.tra2n2s
.tra1n
.trá2n2s
.trá1
.trá1n
.tra1nsa2
.trans1a2b1e2
.transa1b
.trans1a2b1é2
.trans1a2b1i1
.trans1a2b1í1
.1trans1a2c1t
.transa1c
.trans1a2d1
.trans1a2u1
.tran3s2c
.trans1e1
.tráns1e1
.tra1ns3ea1
.tráns3ea1
.tra1n3s2e1n
.transe2u1
.tránse2u1
.transe5ú1
.trans3i1
.trans3í1
.tráns3i1
.trans3í1b
.transi3e1
.transi3é1
.tránsi3e1
.tráns3i4i1
.tran3s4i1l
.tran3s4í1l
.trans1o2
.trans1u2
.tran3s2u1m
.tra2n1ue1
.tranu1
.tri3e1n
.tri1
.trie1
.u1ni3a1n
.u1
.u1n
.uni1
.unia1
.u1ni3á1n
.uniá1
.u3n2i3u1scu3
.uniu1
.uniu1s
.uniu2s1c
.ute2r3ui1
.u1t
.ute1
.ute1r
.uteru1
.ve2l1u1t
.1v
.ve1
.ve1l
.velu1
.1x2
.1z2
.za2i3eu1
.za1
.zai2e1
.zai1
.zeu3g2m
.ze1
.zeu1
.zeu1g
a1
á1
a1e.
ae1
æ1
ǽ1
æ3a1
æ3á1
ǽ3a1
æ3e1
æ3é1
ǽ3e1
æ3i1
æ3í1
ǽ3i1
æ3o1
æ3ó1
ǽ3o1
æ3u1
æ3ú1
ǽ3u1
a1i2a1
ai1
ái2a1
ái1
ai2e1
ai2é1
ai4i1
ai2o1
ai2ó1
ai6o4r.
aio1r
a1i1s
a1í1s
aí1
a3i4t.
ai1t
á3i4t.
ái1t
ai2u1
ái2u1
ai4un4t.
aiu1n
aiu2n1t
a2m3ui1
a1m
amu1
a2u1
a5ú1
á2u1
a3u4m.
au1m
á3u4m.
áu1m
a3u4s.
au1s
á3u4s.
áu1s
2a2x.
a1x
a2y1
á2y1
1b
2b.
2b1b
2b1d
2b1h
2b1j
b2l
2b1m
2b1n
2b1p
b2r
2b1s
b4s2t
2b1t
bu3i4s.
bu1
bui1
bui1s
bu3u1
1c
4c.
2c1c
2c1d
c2h
2c2h.
ch4l
4ch3m
cho3e1
cho1
ch4r
4c2h3t
ci3e2n1t
ci1
cie1
cie1n
ci3e1t
c4l
2c1m
2c1n
2cq
c6r
2c1s
2c1t
cu3
cui4ú1s
cui1
cuiú1
1cu4l1c
cu1l
1cú4l1c
cú1
cú1l
cu4l1n
cú4l1n
cu4l1p
cú4l1p
cu4m1b
cu1m
1cu4n1c
cu1n
cu4n1t
cu4r1s
cu1r
2c1z
1d
2d.
d2æ.
dæ1
d2a4m.
da1
da1m
2d1c
2d1d
2d1f
2d1g
2d3h
d4i4t.
di1
di1t
2d1l
2d1m
2d1n
2d1p
2dq
d2r
2d1s
du3u1
du1
4d1v
2d3w
e1
é1
ë1
e3a4m.
ea1
ea1m
é3a4m.
éa1
éa1m
e5an4t.
ea1n
ea2n1t
é5an4t.
éa1n
éa2n1t
e3a4t.
ea1t
é3a4t.
éa1t
ei2a1
ei1
ei2á1
éi2a1
éi1
e1i2e1
ei2é1
éi2e1
ei4i1
ei2í1
éi4i1
ei4o1
éi4o1
e3i4s.
ei1s
é3i4s.
éi1s
ei2u1
ei2ú1
éi2u1
ei4u4s.
eiu1s
éi4u4s.
éiu1s
e2l3ue1
e1l
elu1
2e4m.
e1m
2e4s.
e1s
e2s3r
2e4t.
e1t
e5ú1
2e2x.
e1x
e3y1
1f
2f.
2f1f
f2l
2f1n
f2r
2f1t
1g
2g.
2g1d
ge3n2ua1
ge1
ge1n
genu1
2g1f
2g1g
g2l
2g1m
g2n
g4ne.
gne1
g2r
2g1s
1h
2h.
h3m
2h1p
2h1t
hu2c5u1s
hu1
hu1c
hu1cu3
i1
í1
ï1
í5a1
í5æ1
í5e1
i1e4l.
ie1
ie1l
i3e4m.
ie1m
i3em4s.
ie2m1s
i3en4s.
ie1n
ie2n1s
i3en4t.
ie2n1t
i3e4s.
ie1s
i3e4t.
ie1t
í5i1
i5i.
i1i1
i3i4s.
ii1s
i5i4t.
ii1t
2i4m.
i1m
í5o1
i2oi2u1
io1
ioi1
i5o4r.
io1r
2i4s.
i1s
2i4t.
i1t
í5u1
i3u2d.
iu1
iu1d
i3u4m.
iu1m
i3un4t.
iu1n
iu2n1t
i3u4r.
iu1r
i3u4s.
iu1s
i2u2s3l
i2ú2s3l
iú1
iú1s
i2u2s3v
i2ú2s3v
2i2x.
i1x
1j
1k
1l
4l.
lang2u5i.
la1
la1n
la2n1g
langu4i1
langu1
langu5i4t.
langui1t
langu5imu4s.
langui1m
languimu1
languimu1s
láng2u5i.
lá1
lá1n
lá2n1g
lángu4i1
lángu1
lángu5i4t.
lángui1t
lángu5imu4s.
lángui1m
lánguimu1
lánguimu1s
2l1b
2l1c
2l1d
2l1f
l3f2t
2l1g
2l1k
2l1l
2l1m
2l1n
2l1p
2lq
2l1r
2l1s
4l1t
lu3i2a.
lu1
lu1i2a1
lui1
lú3i2a.
lú1
lú5i1
lúia1
lu1u1n
luu1
lu1ú1n
luú1
4l1v
4l1z
1m
4m.
2m1b
2m1c
me4t3i2p1s
me1
me1t
meti1
meti1p
2m1d
2m1f
2m1l
2m1m
2m1n
2m1p
4mq
2m1r
2m1s
2m1t
6m1v
1n
2n.
2n1b
2n1c
nco3i1
nco1
4n1d
3ne.
ne1
2n1f
2n1g
ngu6a1
ngu1
ngu2á1
ngu2æ1
ngu2ǽ1
ngu6e1
ngu7era1
ngue1r
ngu7eri1
ngu8eri1s
ngu8eri.
ngu7ero.
nguero1
ngu7erun4t.
ngueru1
ngueru1n
ngueru2n1t
ngu6é1
ngu7érun4t.
ngué1r
nguéru1
nguéru1n
nguéru2n1t
ngu4i1
ngu4i3a1
ngu5i4s1s
ngui1s
ngu5i4s1t
ngu6is3se.
nguisse1
ngu4í1
ngu6o1
ngu6ó1
ngu6u1
ngu6ú1
ngú7a1
ngú1
ngú7æ1
ngú7e1
ngú7i1
ngú7o1
ngú7u1
2n1h
2n1j
2n1l
2n1m
2n1n
2n1p
2nq
2n1r
2n1s
n2s3f
n2s3m
2n1t
nu3i4s.
nu1
nui1
nui1s
4n1v
2n1x2
2n1z
o1
ó1
œ1
oi2a1
oi1
ói2a1
ói1
oi2e1
ói2e1
o1i2o1
ói2o1
oi2u1
ói2u1
o3u4m.
ou1
ou1m
u1
u2s3que1
u1s
u2sq
u1s1qu4
2o2x.
o1x
o3y1
1p
2p.
p2h
2p2h.
pha3e1l
pha1
phae1
2p2h1p
p2h3p2h
2p2h1t
p2l
2p1n
3p2neu1
pne1
po2t3e1n
po1
po1t
pote1
po2t3é1n
poté1
po2t3e1r
po2t3é1r
po2t3e1s
po2t3é1s
4p1p
p2r
2p1s
3p2si1c
psi1
4p3t
3p2t4r
2p1z
1qu4
1qu1i3a1
qui1
1qui3á1
1qui3æ1
1qui3ǽ1
1qu1i3e1
1qu1i3é1
1qu1i3o1
1qui3ó1
1qu1i5u1
1qui5ú1
qu6o.
quo1
qu6u1
qu6u4m.
quu1m
1r
4r.
r2æ.
ræ1
2r1b
2r1c
r4ch3m
rc2h
2r1d
2r1f
2r1g
r2h
ri3e.
ri1
rie1
r4i5i4t.
rii1
rii1t
2r1l
2r1m
2r1n
2r1p
2rq
4r3r
2r1s
2r1t
ru3i4s.
ru1
rui1
rui1s
ru3i4t.
rui1t
r4u4s.
ru1s
4r1v
2r1x
2r1z
1s
4s.
2s1b
2s1c
3s2cæ1
3s2cǽ1
3s2ce1
3s2cé1
3s2ci1
3s2cí1
3s2cœ1
3s2cy1
3s2cý1
2s1d
2s3d2e4m.
sde1
sde1m
2s1f
2s1g
2s1l
2s1m
2s1n
2s3ne.
sne1
2s1p
2sq
2s3qu3e.
s1qu4
sque1
2s1r
4s1s
s3se.
sse1
4s1t
2s4t.
s4t1k
s2t3l
2s3t1n
2s2t3p
s2t3q
6s5tra.
st4r
stra1
6s5tri.
stri1
6s5tr2i4s.
stri1s
6s5tro.
stro1
6s5troru4m.
stro1r
stroru1
stroru1m
6s5tróru4m.
stró1
stró1r
stróru1
stróru1m
6s5tru4m.
stru1
stru1m
1s2t3s
s2t3t
su2b5s4ta1n
su1
su1b
1su2b1s
sub4s2t
substa1
su3i4s.
sui1
sui1s
2s1v
1t
4t.
2t1b
2t1c
2t1d
2t1f
2t1g
t2h4
2t2h.
th4m
1tho4s4t
tho1
tho1s
1thó4s4t
thó1
thó1s
2t2h5p
2th5s
ti3n2ui1
ti1
ti1n
tinu1
ti1o.
tio1
2t1í2p1s
tí1
tí1p
t2l
2t1m
2t1n
2t1p
2tq
t4r
tru5u4m.
tru1
tru1u1
truu1m
tru5u4s.
truu1s
2t1s
2t1t
tu3æ1
tu1
tu5an4t.
tua1
tua1n
1tua2n1t
tu3i4s.
tui1
tui1s
tu3i4t.
tui1t
tu3u1
ú1
ü1
ú5a1
u5an4t.
ua1
ua1n
ua2n1t
u3é1
ú5e1
u3e.
ue1
u3e4m.
ue1m
u3e1n
u3e4s.
ue1s
u3e4t.
ue1t
ú5i1
2ui.
ui1
u1i2a1
u1i2e1
u1i2é1
u1i2o1
u3i4s.
ui1s
u3i4t.
ui1t
u1i2u1
ui4u4s.
uiu1s
ú5o1
u5o.
uo1
u1o3u1
uo3u1s
uo3ú1s
uoú1
ú5u1
u5u4m.
u1u1
uu1m
u5u4s.
uu1s
2u2x.
u1x
1v
1x
2x.
x2i4t.
xi1
xi1t
2xq
2x1t
x2u3i4t.
xu1
xui1
xui1t
x2ú3i4t.
xú1
xú5i1
xúi1t
x2u4m.
xu1m
x2u4s.
xu1s
x2y1
xy4s3t
xy1s
y1
ý1
y3a1
y3e1
y3i1
y3o1
y3u1
y3æ1
y3y1
2y.
2y4s.
y1s
2y2x.
y1x
1z
2z.
2z1z
8́
